Utah statutes.
53B-8d-103.   Tuition waivers for wards of the state.
(1)  Beginning in the 2001-02 academic year, and subject to the limitations in
Subsections (2), (3), and (4), a state institution of higher education shall
waive tuition for each ward of the state who meets the following requirements:
(a)  applies, qualifies, and is admitted as a full-time, part-time, or summer
school student in a program of study leading to a degree or certificate;
(b)  is a resident student of the state as determined under Section 53B-8-102;
(c)  applies to the division for a waiver of tuition under this chapter and
provides evidence satisfactory to the division that:
(i)  the applicant was in the custody of the division for an aggregate period
of not less than 24 months; and
(ii)  the course or courses for which the applicant is seeking a tuition
waiver meet the requirements of Subsection (2);
(d)  applies under Subsection (1)(c) for the first time before the age of 22;
(e)  is certified by the financial aid officer at the higher education
institution as needing the tuition waiver in order to meet recognized
educational expenses;
(f)  maintains satisfactory academic progress, as defined by the institution
of higher education, for each term or semester in which the individual is
enrolled, which may be measured by the definition used for federal student
assistance programs under Title IV of the Higher Education Act of 1965; and
(g)  has not achieved a bachelor's degree and has received tuition
reimbursement under this chapter for less than 124 semester credits or 180
quarter credits at an institution of higher education.
(2)  A ward of the state is eligible for a tuition waiver under this section
of not more than nine semesters.
(3)  Tuition shall be waived:
(a)  after the individual has applied for financial assistance, including
scholarships and Pell Grants; and
(b)  only to the extent that the tuition is not covered or paid by any
scholarship, trust fund, statutory benefit, Pell Grant, or any other source of
tuition coverage available for a waiver under this chapter.
(4)  An institution of higher education shall waive tuition under this chapter
only for courses that are applicable toward the degree or certificate
requirements of the program in which the student is enrolled.
